Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4038
Retirement plans.

(1) For purposes of this section, retirement
plan means a plan or account created by an employer, the principal, or another
individual to provide retirement benefits or deferred compensation of which
the principal is a participant, beneficiary, or owner, including a plan or
account under the following sections of the Internal Revenue Code:

(a) An individual retirement
account under section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 408;

(b) A Roth individual
retirement account under section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.
408A;

(c)
A deemed individual retirement account under section 408(q) of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 408(q);

(d) An annuity or mutual fund custodial account under
section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 403(b);

(e) A pension, profit-sharing,
stock bonus, or other retirement plan qualified under section 401(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 401(a);

(f) A plan under section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code, 26 U.S.C. 457(b); and

(g) A nonqualified deferred compensation plan under
section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 409A.

(2) Unless the power
of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general
authority with respect to retirement plans authorizes the agent to:

(a) Select the form and
timing of payments under a retirement plan and withdraw benefits from a plan;

(b) Make a rollover,
including a direct trustee-to-trustee rollover, of benefits from one retirement
plan to another;

(c)
Establish a retirement plan in the principal's name, including a beneficiary
individual retirement plan;

(d) Make contributions to a retirement plan;

(e) Exercise investment
powers available under a retirement plan; and

(f) Borrow from, sell assets to,
or purchase assets from a retirement plan.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 38.